Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.060

Fraudulent creation or revocation of a mental health advance directive.

(1) For purposes of this section "mental health advance directive" means a written document that is a "mental health advance directive" as defined in RCW 71.32.020.

(2) A person is guilty of fraudulent creation or revocation of a mental health advance directive if he or she knowingly:

(a) Makes, completes, alters, or revokes the mental health advance directive of another without the principal's consent;

(b) Utters, offers, or puts off as true a mental health advance directive that he or she knows to be forged; or

(c) Obtains or prevents the signature of a principal or witness to a mental health advance directive by deception or duress.

(3) Fraudulent creation or revocation of a mental health advance directive is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 283 s 31.]